Tennessee, session 114, HB0236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (11).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Bureau of TennCare within the department of finance and administration,
pursuant to Executive Order No. 23 on October 19, 1999;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0236
000316
- 1 -